Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1183.
do enact as follows:SB1183,11Section 1. 15.915 (3) of the statutes is created to read:SB1183,2,4215.915 (3) Civic information consortium board. (a) There is created a 3civic information consortium board that is attached to the University of Wisconsin 4System under s. 15.03.SB1183,2,65(b) The civic information consortium board shall consist of the following 6members:SB1183,2,971. Four representatives of the University of Wisconsin System, with 8experience or expertise in journalism, media, technology, or American civic culture, 9appointed by the president of the University of Wisconsin System.SB1183,3,3102. Five representatives from local media in this state, including members who 1work for nonprofit news providers and members who work for for-profit news 2providers, appointed by a majority of the members specified in subd. 1. The 3members appointed under this subdivision shall include all of the following:SB1183,3,44a. At least one member whose primary work is in traditional print media.SB1183,3,55b. At least one member whose primary work is in online or new media.SB1183,3,66c. At least one member whose primary work is in radio.SB1183,3,77d. At least one member whose primary work is in television.SB1183,3,983. Two public members appointed by a majority of the members specified in 9subds. 1. and 2.SB1183,3,1210(c) Members of the civic information consortium board shall be appointed for 114-year terms. No member may serve more than 2 terms on the civic information 12consortium board.SB1183,213Section 2. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 14insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table SB1183,320Section 3. 20.290 of the statutes is created to read:SB1183,3,222120.290 Civic information consortium board. There is appropriated to the 22civic information consortium board for the following program:SB1183,4,223(1) Wisconsin Civic Information Consortium, Inc. (a) Grants and 1operations. As a continuing appropriation, the amounts in the schedule for the 2purposes specified in s. 36.70 (2) (b).SB1183,43Section 4. 36.70 of the statutes is created to read:SB1183,4,5436.70 Wisconsin civic information consortium. (1) Definitions. In this 5section:SB1183,4,66(a) “Board” means the civic information consortium board.SB1183,4,87(b) “Corporation” means the corporation formed by the board under sub. (2) 8(a).SB1183,4,189(2) Formation of corporation. (a) The board shall organize and maintain 10a nonstock, nonprofit corporation under ch. 181 for the purpose of administering 11the grant program under sub. (3). Notwithstanding s. 181.0401 (2), the name of the 12corporation shall be the Wisconsin Civic Information Consortium, Inc. The board 13shall organize the corporation so that the board members appointed under s. 15.915 14(3) (b) 1. shall be the members of the corporation. The board shall manage the 15affairs of the corporation, including selecting a president who shall be known as the 16director. The director shall manage the day-to-day operation of the corporation. 17Notwithstanding s. 181.0840 (1), the corporation is not required to have a secretary 18or treasurer.SB1183,4,2219(b) From the appropriation under s. 20.290 (1) (a), the board shall provide 20funding to the corporation to make grants under sub. (3) and for the corporation’s 21operations. The board may not take any action or make any funding decision based 22on the reporting of a recipient of a grant under sub. (3).SB1183,5,423(3) Award of grants. (a) The corporation shall award grants to support 1local journalism and media projects in this state for the purpose of addressing 2communities’ information needs, bolstering media literacy and civic engagement 3across the state, and supporting state residents’ access to high quality, consistent 4local journalism, resulting in a more informed and engaged public.SB1183,5,55(b) A grant application shall include all of the following:SB1183,5,861. An explanation of how the proposed project benefits the state’s civic 7information needs and provides media literacy skills or local journalism access to 8currently underserved residents of this state.SB1183,5,992. Any other information that the corporation requires.SB1183,5,1310(c) The corporation may not award a grant unless the grant recipient enters 11into a written agreement specifying that the grant recipient is and shall remain 12independent from the influence of the state, any institution, and any other provider 13of funds related to the grant.SB1183,5,1514(d) The corporation shall ensure that at least 30 percent of the total amount of 15all grants awarded are distributed to off-campus partners in rural communities.SB1183,5,1816(e) The corporation shall collect data on populations and communities in this 17state that are underserved by local news and shall prioritize directing its funding 18toward these populations and communities.SB1183,5,2319(4) Report. Annually, the board shall submit a report to the governor, and to 20the appropriate standing committees of the legislature under s. 13.172 (3), detailing 21how the funding provided to the corporation under sub. (2) (b) was spent and how it 22advanced the mission of fostering a more informed and engaged public. The report 23shall also include a summary of the data collected under sub. (3) (e).SB1183,51Section 5. Nonstatutory provisions.SB1183,6,122(1) Statement of legislative intent. The legislature finds that an 3informed and engaged electorate is essential to the healthy functioning of 4democratic government. Further, the legislature finds that recent cuts to local 5news media and community organizations have reduced Wisconsinites’ access to 6coverage of important local and state matters. The legislature reaffirms the 7importance of freedom of speech under the First Amendment and the independence 8of the media. It is not the intent of the legislature and this act to influence the 9reporting of any grant recipient. Rather, it is the intent of the legislature and this 10act to address the civic information needs of all Wisconsinites, especially 11underserved communities, by fostering media literacy and civic participation across 12the state through access to high quality local journalism.SB1183,6,1613(2) Civic information consortium board; staggered terms. 14Notwithstanding the length of terms specified for the members of the civic 15information consortium board under s. 15.915 (3) (c), the following members shall 16be appointed for an initial 6-year term:SB1183,6,1717(a) Two of the members appointed under s. 15.915 (3) (b) 1.SB1183,6,1818(b) Two of the members appointed under s. 15.915 (3) (b) 2.SB1183,6,1919(c) One of the members appointed under s. 15.915 (3) (b) 3.SB1183,6,2020